Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-805
Tax Commissioner; agreements authorized.

The Tax Commissioner may enter into written agreements with one or more government-authorized lotteries to participate in the conduct and operation of lottery games and may enter into written agreements with one or more government-authorized lotteries or other persons, entities, organizations, or associations to purchase goods or services in support of lottery games when necessary or desirable to make lottery games more remunerative for the State of Nebraska so long as the games and purchases are consistent with the State Lottery Act. Major procurement purchase requirements under the act shall only apply to the Nebraska portion of any purchase made through the agreements.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 5;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 21;

Laws 1999, LB 479, § 2.